Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Programs for Runaway Minors.

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

Sec. 47.10.300.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department shall

review, inspect, and approve or disapprove for licensing proposed or established programs for runaway minors to ensure the health and safety of minors in the program;

maintain a register of licensed programs for runaway minors;

award nonprofit corporations or municipalities grants for the establishment or operation of licensed programs for runaway minors;

adopt regulations for the administration of AS

47.10.300

—

47.10.390

, including regulations providing for the coordination of services to be provided by licensed programs for runaway minors and by the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

For administration, see 7 AAC 56, art. 2.

For services related to the decision to place a child, see 7 AAC 56, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Juvenile Courts and Delinquent and Dependent Children, § 36.

Sec. 47.10.310.
Licensing of programs for runaway minors.

A person may not operate a program for runaway minors in the state without a license issued under this section. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a violation.

The department may license a program for runaway minors under AS

47.10.300

—

47.10.390

only if the program

is operated by a corporation or a municipality; and

meets the requirements of (c) of this section.

A program for runaway minors shall

explain to a minor who seeks assistance from the program the legal rights and responsibilities of runaway minors and the services and assistance provided for runaway minors by the program and by the state or local municipality;

upon admission of a minor to the program, attempt to determine why the minor is a runaway and what services may be necessary or appropriate for reuniting the minor with the minor’s family;

provide or help arrange for the provision of services necessary to promote the health and welfare of a minor in the program and, if appropriate, members of the minor’s family; services may include, but are not limited to, the provision of food, shelter, clothing, medical care, and individual, group, or family counseling;

within one state working day after admission of a minor to the program inform the department of a minor in the program

who claims to be the victim of child abuse or neglect, as defined in AS

47.17.290

;

whom an employee of the program has cause to believe has been a victim of child abuse or neglect; or

whom an employee of the program has reason to believe is evading the supervision of the department, the person to whom the department has entrusted supervision, or the minor’s legal guardian;

be operated with the goal of reuniting runaway minors with their families, except in cases in which reunification is clearly contrary to the best interest of the minor; and

maintain adequate staffing and accommodations to ensure physical security and to provide crisis services to minors residing in a facility operated by the program; a program that, as determined by the department, regularly receives state money in an amount that exceeds one-fourth of the program’s costs shall maintain semi-secure portions of its facilities in a proportion that meets regulations established by the department; residents under 18 years of age shall be segregated from residents who are 18 years of age or older.

A program for runaway minors may provide services for the protection of the health and welfare of a person under 21 years of age who is in need of the services and who is without a place of shelter in which supervision and care of the person are available.

A program for runaway minors that operates a licensed residential shelter in the state shall provide a shelter with a capacity designated in the license issued under AS

47.10.300

—

47.10.390

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 120 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective August 2, 2010, added (e).

Sec. 47.10.320.
Residence in runaway minor program facilities.

A runaway minor may maintain residency for a period not exceeding 45 days at a facility operated as part of a licensed program for runaway minors. The minor may maintain residency without the consent of the person or agency having custody of the minor, except that if the court has ordered the minor committed to the custody of the department, written consent of the department is required. The residency may be extended for an additional period of 45 days with the written consent of the person or agency having custody of the minor. A minor may not maintain residency beyond the 90th day following admission to a licensed program for runaway minors without the written consent of the person or agency having custody of the minor and the written consent of the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

Sec. 47.10.330.
Notice to minor’s legal custodian.

[Repealed, § 24 ch 33 SLA 1994.]

The director of a program for runaway minors shall promptly notify a minor’s legal custodian if the minor is released from the program into the custody of a person other than the legal custodian or a person representing the legal custodian.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 24 ch 33 SLA 1994)

Sec. 47.10.340.
Confidentiality of records.

Records of a licensed program for runaway minors that identify a minor who has been admitted to or has sought assistance from the program are confidential and are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

, unless

after being informed of the minor’s right to privacy, the minor consents in writing to the disclosure of the records;

the records are relevant to an investigation or proceeding involving child abuse or neglect or a child in need of aid petition; or

disclosure of the records is necessary to protect the life or health of the minor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Sec. 47.10.350.
Immunity from liability.

The officers, directors, and employees of a licensed program for runaway minors are not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in admitting a minor to the program.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of recklessness or intentional misconduct.

The officers, directors, and employees of a licensed program for runaway minors are not criminally liable under AS

11.51.130(a)(4)

for assisting a minor in the program.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 33 SLA 1994)

Sec. 47.10.360.
Municipal powers.

Authority to establish and operate a licensed program for runaway minors is granted to municipalities that do not otherwise have that authority.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988)

Sec. 47.10.390.
Definitions.

In AS

47.10.300

—

47.10.390

,

“licensed program for runaway minors” means a residential or nonresidential program licensed by the department under AS

47.10.310

;

“runaway minor” means a person under 18 years of age who

is habitually absent from home; or

refuses to accept available care;

“semi-secure” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.141(k)

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 43 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 120 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (3), “AS

47.10.141(j)

” was substituted for “AS

47.10.141(e)

” to reflect the 1996 relettering of AS

47.10.141(e)

.

In 2021, in paragraph (3), “ AS

47.10.141(k)

” was substituted for “ AS

47.10.141(j)

” to reflect the 2021 relettering of
AS

47.10.141(j)

.